Arkansas, session 2025, SB304.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Under the authority granted by Arkansas Constitution,
Amendment 51, § 19, Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 51, § 10(b)(2),
concerning transfer and change of status for voter registration, is amended
to read as follows:
(2)(A) If the updated registration information is actually
received in the office of the county clerk of the voter's new county not
later than four (4) days before the polls close for a scheduled election, the
voter shall have the right to vote in the scheduled election in the precinct
into which the voter just moved in the new county.
(B) If the updated registration information is not
actually received by the fourth day before the polls close for a scheduled
*SSS189*
02/25/2025 2:24:18 PM SSS189

SB304
election, the voter shall not be eligible to vote in the scheduled election.



































02/25/2025 2:24:18 PM SSS189